Hawaii statutes.
§291C-137 Mobile electronic
devices. (a) No person shall operate a motor vehicle while using a mobile
electronic device.

(b) The use of a mobile electronic device for
the sole purpose of making a "911" emergency communication shall be
an affirmative defense to this law.

(c) No person under eighteen years of age
shall operate a motor vehicle while utilizing a hands-free mobile electronic
device, except for the sole purpose of making a "911" emergency
communication.

(d) The following persons shall be exempt from
subsection (a):

(1) Emergency responders using a mobile electronic
device while in the performance and scope of their official duties;

(2) Drivers using a two-way radio or a private Land
Mobile Radio System, within the meaning of title 47 Code of Federal Regulations
part 90, while in the performance and scope of their work-related duties and
who are operating fleet vehicles or who possess a commercial vehicle license;

(3) Drivers holding a valid amateur radio operator
license issued by the Federal Communications Commission and using a half-duplex
two-way radio; or

(4) Drivers of vehicles that are at a complete stop,
while the engine is turned off, in a safe location by the side of the road out
of the way of traffic.

(e) As used in this section:

"Emergency responders" includes
firefighters, emergency medical technicians, mobile intensive care technicians,
emergency management workers, police officers, and federal and state law
enforcement officers.

"Fleet vehicle" means any vehicle
validly registered pursuant to section 286-53.5.

"Mobile electronic device" means any
handheld or other portable electronic equipment capable of providing wireless
or data communication between two or more persons or of providing amusement,
including but not limited to a cellular phone, text messaging device, paging
device, personal digital assistant, laptop computer, video game, or digital
photographic device, but does not include any audio equipment or any equipment
installed in a motor vehicle for the purpose of providing navigation, emergency
assistance to the operator of the motor vehicle, or video entertainment to the
passengers in the rear seats of the motor vehicle.

"Operate" a motor vehicle means to
drive or assume actual physical control of the vehicle upon a public way,
street, road, or highway, including operation while temporarily stationary
because of traffic, a traffic light, or a stop sign.

"Use" or "using" means
holding a mobile electronic device while operating a motor vehicle.

(f) Every person who violates this section
shall be subject to a fine of $250 that shall be deposited into the state
highway fund; provided that if a person violates this section while operating a
motor vehicle in a school zone or construction area, as defined in section
291C-104, the fine shall be $300, which shall be paid to the director of
finance pursuant to section 291C-171.

(g) Any violation as provided in subsections
(a) and (c) shall be deemed to be a traffic infraction as defined in section
291D-2.

(h) This section shall supersede any county
ordinance regulating the use or utilization of mobile electronic devices while
operating a motor vehicle. [L 2013, c 74, §2; am L 2014, c 175, §2; am L 2015,
c 35, §6]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next